Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-859
Professional Practices Commission; declaration.

The Legislature declares teaching in public schools in this state and the related services, including administrative and supervisory services, to be a profession, with all of the rights, responsibilities, and privileges accorded other recognized professions.

Laws 1967, c. 549, § 1, p. 1813;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1280;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 484.